sl-SI: Živali in pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Ležišča za hišne ljubljenčke: Košare; Ležišča z vzglavniki; Hiške za hišne ljubljenčke; Hladilna ležišča; Okrogla ležišča; Viseče mreže; Gnezda; Ortopedska ležišča; Stoli za hišne ljubljenčke; Ležalniki za hišne ljubljenčke; Ležišča z blazinami; Ležišča za radiator; Stolpi
es: Productos para mascotas y animales > Productos para mascotas > Camas para mascotas: Cestas; Camas de espuma; Cuevas; Camas de enfriamiento; Donuts; Hamacas; Nidos; Camas ortopédicas; Sillas para mascotas; Cunas para mascotas; Camas con almohada; Camas radiador; Torres
ja: ペット・ペット用品 > ペット用品 > ペット用ベッド: かご・バスケット; ボルスターベッド; ケイブ; クーリングベッド; ドーナツ; ハンモック; ネスト; オーソペディックベッド; ペットチェア; ペット用折りたたみ式ベッド; ピローベッド; ラジエーターベッド; タワー
vi: Đồ dùng cho động vật & thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho thú cưng > Giường cho thú cưng: Giỏ; Nệm ngủ; Nhà lều; Thảm làm mát; Bánh rán vòng; Võng; Ổ nằm; Đệm xốp chỉnh hình; Ghế cho thú cưng; Giường cũi cho thú cưng; Đệm nằm; Giường tản nhiệt; Tháp
en: Animals & Pet Supplies > Pet Supplies > Pet Beds: Baskets; Bolster Beds; Caves; Cooling Beds; Donuts; Hammocks; Nests; Orthopedic Beds; Pet Chairs; Pet Cots; Pillow Beds; Radiator Beds; Towers
ko: 동물/반려동물 용품 > 반려동물 용품 > 반려동물 침대: 바구니; 볼스터 침대; 동굴 침대; 쿨매트 침대; 도넛; 해먹; 방석; 정형외과 침대; 반려동물 의자; 반려동물 아웃도어 의자; 베개 침대; 라디에이터용 침대; 타워
da: Dyr og tilbehør til kæledyr > Tilbehør til kæledyr > Senge til kæledyr: Kurve; Polstrede senge; Huler; Kølende senge; Donuts; Hængekøjer; Reder; Ortopædiske senge; Stole til kæledyr; Senge til kæledyr; Pudesenge; Radiatorsenge; Tårne
tr: Hayvanlar ve Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Yatakları: Sepetler; Destek Yatakları; Mağaralar; Soğutma Yatakları; Donat; Hamaklar; Yuvalar; Ortopedik Yataklar; Evcil Hayvan Sandalyeleri; Evcil Hayvan Karyolaları; Yastık Yataklar; Radyatör Yatakları; Kuleler
zh-TW: 動物/寵物補給品 > 寵物用品 > 寵物睡床: 籃子; 軟墊床; 窩; 涼墊; 甜甜圈; 吊床; 巢; 護骨記憶床; 寵物椅; 寵物架高床; 附枕頭床; 散熱床; 多層床
nl: Dieren > Benodigdheden voor huisdieren > Huisdierbedden: Manden; Bolsterbedden; Grotten; Koelbedden; Donuts; Hangmatten; Nesten; Orthopedische bedden; Huisdierstoelen; Huisdierkampeerbedjes; Kussenbedden; Radiatorbedden; Torens
sk-SK: Potreby pre zvieratá a domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre domácich miláčikov > Postele pre domácich miláčikov: Koše; Pelechy; Jaskyne; Chladiace lôžka; Pelechy v tvare šišky; Hojdacie siete; Hniezda; Ortopedické postele; Stoličky pre domácich miláčikov; Postieľky pre domácich miláčikov; Vankúšové postele; Pelechy na radiátore; Veže
pt-BR: Animais e produtos para animais de estimação > Suprimentos para animais de estimação > Camas para animais de estimação: Cestos; Camas reforçadas; Cavernas; Camas de resfriamento; Donuts; Redes de descanso; Ninhos; Camas ortopédicas; Cadeiras para animais de estimação; Berços para animais; Camas com travesseiro; Camas para radiador; Torres
el: Ζώα και προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Κρεβάτια για κατοικίδια ζώα: Καλάθια; Κρεβάτια Bolster; Σπηλιές; Κρεβάτια Ψύξης; Κρεβάτια τύπου Donut; Κούνιες (Hammocks); Φωλιές; Ορθοπεδικά κρεβάτια; Καρέκλες για κατοικίδια ζώα; Κούνιες για κατοικίδια ζώα; Μαξιλάρια κρεβάτια; Θερμαντικά κρεβάτια; Κρεβάτια πύργοι
lt-LT: Gyvūnai ir prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Guoliai naminiams gyvūnams: Krepšiai; Minkšti guoliai paaukštintais kraštais; Urvai; Vėsinantys guoliai; Apvalūs guoliai; Hamakai; Lizdai; Ortopediniai guoliai; Kėdės naminiams gyvūnams; Pakelti guoliai naminiams gyvūnams; Guoliai su pagalvėmis; Šildomi guoliai; Bokštai
nb: Produkter til dyr og husdyr > Husdyrprodukter > Husdyrsenger: Kurver; Polstrede senger; Grotter; Kjølende senger; Donuts; Hammocker; Reder; Ortopediske senger; Dyrestoler; Barnesenger til husdyr; Putesenger; Radiatorsenger; Tårn
sv: Djur och tillbehör till husdjur > Tillbehör till husdjur > Husdjurssängar: Korgar; Bolstersängar; Grottor; Kylande sängar; Munkar; Hängmattor; Bon; Ortopediska sängar; Husdjursstolar; Husdjurskorgar; Kuddsängar; Radiatorsängar; Torn
de: Tiere & Tierbedarf > Haustierbedarf > Haustierbetten: Körbe; Polsterbetten; Höhlen; Kühlende Betten; Donuts; Hängematten; Nester; Orthopädische Betten; Haustierstühle; Haustierliegen; Kissenbetten; Heizkörperliegen; Türme
pl: Zwierzęta i artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły dla zwierząt > Legowiska dla zwierząt: Koszyki; Miękkie legowiska; Legowiska z daszkiem; Legowiska chłodzące; Pączki; Hamaki; Gniazda; Legowiska ortopedyczne; Krzesła dla zwierząt; Składane legowiska dla zwierząt; Legowiska z poduszkami; Legowiska podgrzewane; Wieże
th: อุปกรณ์สำหรับสัตว์และสัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์สัตว์เลี้ยง > ที่นอนสัตว์เลี้ยง: ตะกร้า; เบาะนอน; ถ้ำ; เตียงทำความเย็น; โดนัท; เปลญวน; รัง; เตียงเพื่อกระดูกและข้อ; เก้าอี้สัตว์เลี้ยง; เตียงสัตว์เลี้ยงพับได้; ที่นอนแบบหมอน; เตียงแขวน; คอนโด
zh-CN: 动物/宠物用品 > 宠物用品 > 宠物床: 收纳篮/收纳筐; 软垫床; 洞穴; 冷却床; 甜甜圈; 吊床; 宠物窝; 矫形床; 宠物椅; 宠物婴儿床; 枕头床; 散热床; 塔楼
hr-HR: Životinje i potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Kreveti za kućne ljubimce: Košare; Kreveti s podupiračima; Špilje; Rashladni kreveti; Okrugli kreveti; Viseće mreže; Gnijezda; Ortopedski kreveti; Stolice za kućne ljubimce; Ležaljke za kućne ljubimce; Jastuci za spavanje; Kreveti za radijator; Tornjevi
cs: Chovatelství > Potřeby pro domácí zvířata > Pelíšky pro domácí mazlíčky: Koše; Pelíšek s vyvýšenými okraji; Kukaně; Chladící pelíšky; Koblihy; Hamaky a houpací sítě; Hnízda; Ortopedické pelíšky; Židle pro domácí mazlíčky; Lehátka pro domácí mazlíčky; Matrace; Pelíšky na topení (radiátor); Věže s pelíšky
fr: Animaux et articles pour animaux de compagnie > Articles pour animaux de compagnie > Lits pour animaux de compagnie: Paniers; Lits traversins; Grottes; Lits rafraîchissants; Donuts; Hamacs; Nids; Lits orthopédiques; Chaises pour animaux de compagnie; Lit pour animaux de compagnie; Lits-oreillers; Lits radiateurs; Tours
ru: Животные и товары для питомцев > Товары для домашних животных > Лежаки для домашних животных: Лежаки-корзинки; Лежаки с мягкими бортиками; Лежаки-норки; Охлаждающие лежаки; Круглые лежаки; Гамаки; Лежаки-гнезда; Ортопедические лежаки; Лежаки-кресла; Лежаки-раскладушки; Лежаки-подушки; Лежаки для радиаторов отопления; Лежаки на ножках
it: Articoli per animali > Animali domestici - Articoli > Lettini per animali domestici: Cesti; Letti di sostegno; Grotte; Lettini di raffreddamento; Ciambelle; Amache; Nidi; Letti ortopedici; Sedie per animali domestici; Culle per animali domestici; Letti con cuscini; Letti per radiatori; Torri
hu: Állatok és kisállatkellékek > Háziállat-kellékek > Háziállatágyak: Kosarak; Párnás ágyak; Barlangok; Hűtőágyak; Fánkok; Függőágyak; Fészkek; Ortopéd ágyak; Háziállatszékek; Háziállatfekhelyek; Párnás ágyak; Radiátoros ágyak; Tornyok
fi: Eläinten ja lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikkien pedit: Korit; Reunalliset pedit; Luolat; Viilentävät pedit; Donitsit; Riippumatot; Pesät; Ortopediset pedit; Lemmikkien tuolit; Lemmikkien sängyt; Pehmustetut pedit; Patteripedit; Tornit
bg-BG: Артикули за животни и домашни любимци > Артикули за домашни любимци > Легла за домашни любимци: Кошове; Легла с подпора за врата; Легла тип пещера; Охлаждащи легла; Легла тип „поничка“; Хамаци; Гнезда; Ортопедични легла; Столчета за домашни любимци; Кошари за домашни любимци; Легла тип възглавница; Легла за радиатори; Повдигнати легла
ro-RO: Animale și articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru animale de companie > Paturi pentru animale de companie: Coșuri; Paturi supraînălțate; Adăposturi; Paturi cu răcire; Paturi moi rotunde; Hamace; Cuiburi; Paturi ortopedice; Scaune pentru animale de companie; Pătuțuri pentru animale de companie; Paturi cu perne; Paturi cu radiator; Turnuri
pt-PT: Artigos para animais e animais estimação > Artigos para animais > Camas para animais de estimação: Cestos; Camas acolchoadas; Camas gruta; Camas refrescantes; Donuts; Redes; Ninhos; Camas ortopédicas; Cadeiras para animais de estimação; Berços para animais de estimação; Camas de travesseiro; Camas para radiador; Torres